South Dakota, session 2026, HB1052.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. The Department of Game, Fish and Parks is authorized to transfer an existing
disused hydroelectric plant, to be used as a historic preservation site museum or for another
public purpose, to the Spearfish Canyon Foundation, for the maintenance of all or any portion
of the real property, together with any related personal property and improvements located
on the following real property:
Certain property described as Lot A in HMC Lot 2A of the Spearfish Placer of MS 439
located in Section 17 – Township 5 North – Range 2 East of the B.H.M., Lawrence County,
South Dakota, comprising 3.75 acres, more or less.
The real property must be conveyed pursuant to a special warranty deed on the condition
that the title automatically reverts to the state if the real property ceases to be used for a
public purpose for two consecutive years.
Section 2. Any personal property and improvements on the real property, which are generally
considered a part of the real property described in section 1 of this Act, but which are not
specifically included in the legal description as set forth in section 1 of this Act, may be
transferred, as though specifically described, pursuant to this Act.
Section 3. Conveyance of title to the Spearfish Canyon Foundation must be:
(1) Made in the name of the State of South Dakota, acting by and through the
Department of Game, Fish and Parks;
(2) Executed in the manner provided by § 5-2-11; and
(3) Subject to all applicable constitutional and statutory reservations.

26.569.11 2 1052
An Act to authorize the transfer of certain surplus real property by the Department of Game,
Fish and Parks to the Spearfish Canyon Foundation for a public purpose.
Received at this Executive Office
I certify that the attached Act originated in this _____ day of _____________,
the:
2026 at ____________M.
House as Bill No. 1052
By
Chief Clerk of the House for the Governor
The attached Act is hereby
approved this ________ day of
Speaker of the House ______________, A.D., 2026
Attest:
Governor
Chief Clerk of the House
STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA,
ss.
Office of the Secretary of State
President of the Senate
Filed ____________, 2026
Attest: at _________ o'clock __M.
Secretary of the Senate Secretary of State
House Bill No. 1052 By
File No. ____ Asst. Secretary of State
Chapter No. ______
HB1052 ENROLLED